Nevada, session 83, AB308.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 678B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
The Board may, in accordance with policies and procedures
established by the Board by regulation, waive any requirement to
obtain a registration card pursuant to this title for any person who
holds an ownership interest of 5 percent or more in a cannabis
establishment.
Sec. 2. NRS 678B.340 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678B.340 1. [A] Except as otherwise provided in this
section and section 1 of this act, a person shall not serve as an
owner, officer or board member of, volunteer or work at, contract
to provide labor to or be employed by an independent contractor to
provide labor to a cannabis establishment as a cannabis
establishment agent unless the person is registered with the Board
pursuant to this section.
2. A person who wishes to serve as an owner, officer or board
member of or volunteer or work at a cannabis establishment shall
submit to the Board an application on a form prescribed by the
Board. The application must be accompanied by:
(a) The name, address and date of birth of the prospective
cannabis establishment agent;
(b) A statement signed by the prospective cannabis
establishment agent pledging not to dispense or otherwise divert
cannabis to any person who is not authorized to possess cannabis in
accordance with the provisions of this title;
(c) A statement signed by the prospective cannabis
establishment agent asserting that he or she has not previously had a
cannabis establishment agent registration card revoked;
(d) The application fee, as set forth in NRS 678B.390; and
(e) Such other information as the Board may require by
regulation.
3. A person who wishes to contract to provide labor to or be
employed by an independent contractor to provide labor to a
cannabis establishment shall submit to the Board an application on a
form prescribed by the Board for the registration of the independent
contractor and each employee of the independent contractor who
will provide labor as a cannabis establishment agent. The
application must be accompanied by:
(a) The name, address and, if the prospective cannabis
establishment agent has a state business license, the business
identification number assigned by the Secretary of State upon
compliance with the provisions of chapter 76 of NRS;
-
*AB308*

– 4 –
(b) The name, address and date of birth of each employee of the
prospective cannabis establishment agent who will provide labor as
a cannabis establishment agent;
(c) A statement signed by the prospective cannabis
establishment agent pledging not to dispense or otherwise divert
cannabis to, or allow any of its employees to dispense or otherwise
divert cannabis to, any person who is not authorized to possess
cannabis in accordance with the provisions of this title;
(d) A statement signed by the prospective cannabis
establishment agent asserting that it has not previously had a
cannabis establishment agent registration card revoked and that
none of its employees who will provide labor as a cannabis
establishment agent have previously had a cannabis establishment
agent registration card revoked;
(e) The application fee, as set forth in NRS 678B.390; and
(f) Such other information as the Board may require by
regulation.
4. The Board may conduct any investigation of a prospective
cannabis establishment agent and, for an independent contractor,
each employee of the prospective cannabis establishment agent who
will provide labor as a cannabis establishment agent, that the Board
deems appropriate. In connection with such an investigation, the
Board may:
(a) Conduct or accept any background check the Board
determines to be reliable and expedient to determine the criminal
history of the prospective cannabis establishment agent or the
employee;
(b) Require a prospective cannabis establishment agent, if a
natural person, and each employee of a prospective cannabis
establishment agent who will provide labor as a cannabis
establishment agent to submit to the Board a complete set of
fingerprints and written permission authorizing the Board to forward
the fingerprints to the Central Repository for Nevada Records of
Criminal History for submission to the Federal Bureau of
Investigation for its report; and
(c) If the Board imposes the requirement described in paragraph
(b), submit the fingerprints of the prospective cannabis
establishment agent and each employee of the prospective
cannabis establishment agent who will provide labor as a cannabis
establishment agent to the Central Repository for Nevada Records
of Criminal History for submission to the Federal Bureau of
Investigation for its report.
5. A cannabis establishment shall notify the Board within 10
business days after a cannabis establishment agent ceases to be
-
*AB308*

– 5 –
employed by, volunteer at or provide labor as a cannabis
establishment agent to the cannabis establishment.
6. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 678B.633, a person
who:
(a) Has been convicted of an excluded felony offense;
(b) Is less than 21 years of age; or
(c) Is not qualified, in the determination of the Board pursuant to
NRS 678B.200,
 shall not serve as a cannabis establishment agent.
7. The provisions of this section do not require a person who is
an owner, officer or board member of a cannabis establishment to
resubmit information already furnished to the Board at the time the
establishment was licensed with the Board.
8. If an applicant for registration as a cannabis establishment
agent satisfies the requirements of this section, is found to be
qualified by the Board pursuant to NRS 678B.200 and is not
disqualified from serving as such an agent pursuant to this section or
any other applicable law, the Board shall issue to the person and, for
an independent contractor, to each person identified in the
independent contractor’s application for registration as an employee
who will provide labor as a cannabis establishment agent, a cannabis
establishment agent registration card. If the Board does not act upon
an application for a cannabis establishment agent registration card
within 45 days after the date on which the application is received,
the application shall be deemed conditionally approved until such
time as the Board acts upon the application. [A] An initial cannabis
establishment agent registration card expires 2 years after the date of
issuance and may be renewed . [upon:] Any renewed cannabis
establishment agent registration card expires 2 years after the
expiration date of the most recent cannabis establishment agent
registration card issued to or renewed by the person pursuant to
this section.
9. To renew a cannabis establishment agent registration card,
a person must, on or before the date on which the registration
card expires:
(a) [Resubmission of] Resubmit the information set forth in this
section; and
(b) [Payment of] Pay the renewal fee set forth in
NRS 678B.390.
[9. A person to whom a cannabis establishment agent
registration card is issued or for whom such a registration card is
renewed shall submit to the Board on the date of the first
anniversary of the issuance or renewal an affidavit attesting that in
the preceding year there has been no change in the information
-
*AB308*

– 6 –
previously provided to the Board which would subject the person to
disciplinary action by the Board.]
10. A cannabis establishment agent registration card issued
pursuant to this section to an independent contractor or an employee
of an independent contractor authorizes the independent contractor
or employee to provide labor to any cannabis establishment in this
State.
11. A cannabis establishment agent registration card issued
pursuant to this section to a person who wishes to serve as an
owner, officer or board member of or volunteer or work at a
cannabis establishment other than a cannabis independent testing
laboratory authorizes the person to serve as an owner, officer or
board member of or volunteer or work at any cannabis
establishment in this State [for which the category of the cannabis
establishment agent registration card authorizes the person to
volunteer or work.] other than a cannabis independent testing
laboratory.
12. A cannabis establishment agent registration card issued
pursuant to this section to a person who wishes to serve as an
owner, officer or board member of or volunteer or work at a
cannabis independent testing laboratory authorizes the person to
serve as an owner, officer or board member of or volunteer or
work at any cannabis independent testing laboratory in this State.
13. Except as otherwise prescribed by regulation of the Board,
an applicant for registration or renewal of registration as a cannabis
establishment agent is deemed temporarily registered as a cannabis
establishment agent on the date on which a complete application for
registration or renewal of registration is submitted to the Board. A
temporary registration as a cannabis establishment agent expires 45
days after the date upon which the application is received.
[13.] 14. A person who holds an ownership interest of less
than 5 percent in a cannabis establishment is not required to obtain a
cannabis establishment agent registration card pursuant to this
section. The Board may, in connection with the issuance or renewal
of a license pursuant to NRS 678B.210 or 678B.250, conduct such
investigations of such a person as the Board determines to be
necessary.
Sec. 3. NRS 678B.350 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678B.350 1. [In] Except as otherwise provided in section 1
of this act, in addition to the requirements set forth in NRS
678B.340, a person shall not hold an ownership interest in a
cannabis establishment of 5 percent or more unless the person first
secures a cannabis establishment agent registration card for a
cannabis executive issued by the Board.
-
*AB308*

– 7 –
2. A person who wishes to hold an ownership interest in a
cannabis establishment of 5 percent or more shall submit to the
Board an application on a form prescribed by the Board. The
application must be accompanied by:
(a) The name, address and date of birth of the applicant;
(b) A statement signed by the applicant asserting that he or she
has not previously had a cannabis establishment agent registration
card for a cannabis executive revoked;
(c) A complete set of the fingerprints and written permission of
the applicant authorizing the Board to forward the fingerprints to the
Central Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal History for
submission to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for its report;
(d) Any information required by the Board to complete an
investigation into the background of the applicant, including,
without limitation, financial records and other information relating
to the business affairs of the applicant;
(e) The application fee, as set forth in NRS 678B.390; and
(f) Such other information as the Board may require by
regulation.
3. If the Board determines the applicant is qualified to receive a
cannabis establishment agent registration card for a cannabis
executive pursuant to NRS 678B.200, the Board shall issue to the
person a cannabis establishment agent registration card for a
cannabis executive.
4. [A] An initial cannabis establishment agent registration card
for a cannabis executive expires 2 years after the date of issuance
and may be renewed . [upon:] Any renewed cannabis establishment
agent registration card for a cannabis executive expires 2 years
after the expiration date of the most recent cannabis establishment
agent registration card for a cannabis executive issued to or
renewed by the person pursuant to this section.
5. To renew a cannabis establishment agent registration card
for a cannabis executive, a person must, on or before the date the
registration card expires:
(a) [Resubmission of] Resubmit the information set forth in this
section; and
(b) [Payment of] Pay the renewal fee set forth in
NRS 678B.390.
[5. A person to whom a cannabis establishment agent
registration card for a cannabis executive is issued or for whom such
a registration card is renewed shall submit to the Board on the date
of the first anniversary of the issuance or renewal an affidavit
attesting that in the preceding year there has been no change in the
information previously provided to the Board which would subject
the person to disciplinary action by the Board.]
-
*AB308*

– 8 –
Sec. 4. NRS 678B.355 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678B.355 1. In addition to the requirements set forth in NRS
678B.340, a person shall not act as a receiver for a cannabis
establishment subject to a receivership unless the person first
secures a cannabis establishment agent registration card for a
cannabis receiver issued by the Board.
2. A person who wishes to act as a receiver for a cannabis
establishment subject to a receivership shall submit to the Board an
application on a form prescribed by the Board. The application must
be accompanied by:
(a) The name, address and date of birth of the applicant;
(b) A statement signed by the applicant asserting that he or she
has not previously had a cannabis establishment agent registration
card for a cannabis receiver revoked;
(c) A complete set of the fingerprints and written permission of
the applicant authorizing the Board to forward the fingerprints to the
Central Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal History for
submission to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for its report;
(d) Any information required by the Board to complete an
investigation into the background of the applicant;
(e) Proof satisfactory to the Board that the applicant has:
(1) Experience in or knowledge of the cannabis industry;
(2) Experience as a receiver appointed by a court;
(3) The knowledge and skills necessary to make reasonable
financial decisions with respect to the finances of a cannabis
establishment subject to a receivership; and
(4) Adequate financial capacity to fulfill the duties of a
receiver;
(f) The application fee, as set forth in NRS 678B.390; and
(g) Such other information as the Board may require by
regulation.
3. If the Board determines the applicant is qualified to receive a
cannabis establishment agent registration card for a cannabis
receiver pursuant to NRS 678B.200, the Board shall issue to the
person a cannabis establishment agent registration card for a
cannabis receiver.
4. [A] An initial cannabis establishment agent registration card
for a cannabis receiver expires 2 years after the date of issuance and
may be renewed . [upon:] Any renewed cannabis establishment
agent registration card for a cannabis receiver expires 2 years
after the expiration date of the most recent cannabis establishment
agent registration card for a cannabis receiver issued to or
renewed by the person pursuant to this section.
-
*AB308*

– 9 –
5. To renew a cannabis establishment agent registration card
for a cannabis receiver, a person must, on or before the date the
registration card expires:
(a) [Resubmission of] Resubmit the information set forth in this
section; and
(b) [Payment of] Pay the renewal fee set forth in
NRS 678B.390.
[5. A person to whom a cannabis establishment agent
registration card for a cannabis receiver is issued or for whom such
a registration card is renewed shall submit to the Board on the date
of the first anniversary of the issuance or renewal an affidavit
attesting that in the preceding year there has been no change in the
information previously provided to the Board which would subject
the person to disciplinary action by the Board.]
Sec. 5. NRS 678B.390 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678B.390 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3,
the Board shall collect not more than the following maximum fees:

For the initial issuance of a medical cannabis
establishment license for a medical cannabis
dispensary ............................................................... $30,000
For the renewal of a medical cannabis
establishment license for a medical cannabis
dispensary ................................................................... 5,000
For the initial issuance of a medical cannabis
establishment license for a medical cannabis
cultivation facility ...................................................... 3,000
For the renewal of a medical cannabis
establishment license for a medical cannabis
cultivation facility ...................................................... 1,000
For the initial issuance of a medical cannabis
establishment license for a medical cannabis
production facility ...................................................... 3,000
For the renewal of a medical cannabis
establishment license for a medical cannabis
production facility ...................................................... 1,000
For the initial issuance of a medical cannabis
establishment license for a medical cannabis
independent testing laboratory ................................... 5,000
For the renewal of a medical cannabis
establishment license for a medical cannabis
independent testing laboratory ................................... 3,000
For the initial issuance of an adult-use cannabis
establishment license for an adult-use cannabis
retail store ................................................................. 20,000
-
*AB308*

– 10 –
For the renewal of an adult-use cannabis
establishment license for an adult-use cannabis
retail store ................................................................. $5,000
For the initial issuance of an adult-use cannabis
establishment license for an adult-use cannabis
cultivation facility ...................................................... 3,000
For the renewal of an adult-use cannabis
establishment license for an adult-use cannabis
cultivation facility ...................................................... 1,000
For the initial issuance of an adult-use cannabis
establishment license for an adult-use cannabis
production facility ...................................................... 3,000
For the renewal of an adult-use cannabis
establishment license for an adult-use cannabis
production facility ...................................................... 1,000
For the initial issuance of an adult-use cannabis
establishment license for an adult-use cannabis
independent testing laboratory ................................... 5,000
For the renewal of an adult-use cannabis
establishment license for an adult-use cannabis
independent testing laboratory ................................... 3,000
For the initial issuance of an adult-use cannabis
establishment license for a retail cannabis
consumption lounge ................................................. 10,000
For the renewal of an adult-use cannabis
establishment license for a retail cannabis
consumption lounge ................................................. 10,000
For the initial issuance of an adult-use cannabis
establishment license for an independent
cannabis consumption lounge .................................. 10,000
For the renewal of an adult-use cannabis
establishment license for an independent
cannabis consumption lounge .................................. 10,000
For the initial issuance of an adult-use cannabis
establishment license for an adult-use cannabis
distributor ................................................................. 15,000
For the renewal of an adult-use cannabis
establishment license for an adult-use cannabis
distributor ................................................................... 5,000
For each person identified in an application for the
initial issuance of a cannabis establishment
agent registration card other than a person
identified as an owner, officer or board
member of a cannabis establishment ........................... 150
-
*AB308*

– 11 –
For each person identified in an application for the
renewal of a cannabis establishment agent
registration card other than a person identified
as an owner, officer or board member of a
cannabis establishment .............................................. $150
For each person identified in an application for
the initial issuance of a cannabis
establishment agent registration card as an
owner, officer or board member of a cannabis
establishment ................................................................ 400
For each person identified in an application for
the renewal of a cannabis establishment
agent registration card as an owner, officer or
board member of a cannabis establishment ................ 400
For each person identified in an application for
the initial issuance of a cannabis
establishment agent registration card for a
cannabis executive ........................................................ 400
For each person identified in an application for
the renewal of a cannabis establishment
agent registration card for a cannabis
executive ....................................................................... 400
For each person identified in an application for
the initial issuance of a cannabis
establishment agent registration card for a
cannabis receiver .......................................................... 400
For each person identified in an application for
the renewal of a cannabis establishment
agent registration card for a cannabis
receiver .......................................................................... 400

2. The Board may by regulation establish reduced fees for:
(a) The initial issuance and renewal of an adult-use cannabis
establishment license for an independent cannabis consumption
lounge; and
(b) The application fee set forth in subsection 3,
 for a social equity applicant. Such a reduction must not reduce
the fee paid by a social equity applicant by more than 75 percent of
the fee paid by an applicant who is not a social equity applicant.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, in addition to
the fees described in subsection 1, each applicant for a medical
cannabis establishment license pursuant to NRS 678B.210 or adult-
use cannabis establishment license pursuant to NRS 678B.250 must
pay to the Board:
-
*AB308*

– 12 –
(a) For an application for a license other than an adult-use
cannabis establishment license for a retail cannabis consumption
lounge or independent cannabis consumption lounge, a one-time,
nonrefundable application fee of $5,000;
(b) For an application for an adult-use cannabis establishment
license for a retail cannabis consumption lounge, a one-time,
nonrefundable application fee of $100,000;
(c) For an application for an adult-use cannabis establishment
license for an independent cannabis consumption lounge, a one-
time, nonrefundable application fee of $10,000; and
(d) The actual costs paid by the Board to a law enforcement
agency or other person who is not an employee of the Board to
conduct any background checks in connection with the application.
4. The Board may charge a cannabis establishment for the
actual costs paid by the Board to a law enforcement agency or other
person who is not an employee of the Board to conduct any
background checks in connection with a transfer of ownership
interest in the cannabis establishment pursuant to the regulations
adopted by the Board pursuant to NRS 678B.380.
5. In addition to any other applicable fees described in
subsections 1, 3 and 4, the Board may charge a licensee or an
applicant for a license the amounts specified in subsection 6 for the
costs incurred by the Board and its staff for an investigation
conducted in connection with:
(a) A transfer of ownership interest in a cannabis establishment
pursuant to the regulations adopted by the Board pursuant to
NRS 678B.380;
(b) An application for the initial issuance of a license;
(c) A request to obtain any approval that may be required by the
Board to enter into an agreement to provide management services to
a cannabis establishment; or
(d) A waiver that is requested pursuant to the provisions of this
title or the regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
6. The charges authorized by subsection 5 must be limited to:
(a) A reasonable hourly fee at a rate established by the Board by
regulation for each hour spent by agents of the Board in conducting
the investigation; and
(b) Costs for the travel expenses and per diem allowances of the
agents of the Board conducting the investigation. The per diem
allowances and travel expenses must be assessed at the rate
established by the State Board of Examiners for state officers and
employees generally.
7. Any revenue generated from the fees imposed pursuant to
this section:
-
*AB308*

– 13 –
(a) Must be expended first to pay the costs of the Board in
carrying out the provisions of this title; and
(b) If any excess revenue remains after paying the costs
described in paragraph (a), such excess revenue must be paid over to
the State Treasurer to be deposited to the credit of the State
Education Fund.
8. The Board shall not charge a licensee, registrant or applicant
for a license or registration card any fee, cost, fine or other charge
that is not expressly authorized by the provisions of this title. Such
prohibited charges include, without limitation, any charge for the
costs of ongoing activities of the Board relating to the oversight of a
cannabis establishment, including, without limitation, any charge for
costs relating to:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, travel or
lodging for an agent of the Board;
(b) Any routine inspection or audit;
(c) The preparation for and attendance at a hearing by an agent
of the Board;
(d) An investigation of a complaint submitted to the Board by a
person who is not associated with the Board; or
(e) Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3, 4 and 5, any
other type of inspection, audit or investigation.
Sec. 6. NRS 678B.650 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678B.650 The Board shall adopt such regulations as it
determines to be necessary or advisable to carry out the provisions
of this chapter. Such regulations are in addition to any requirements
set forth in statute and must, without limitation:
1. Prescribe the form and any additional required content of
applications for licenses or registration cards issued pursuant to this
chapter;
2. Establish procedures for the suspension or revocation of a
license or registration card or other disciplinary action to be taken
against a licensee or registrant;
3. Set forth rules pertaining to the safe and healthful operation
of cannabis establishments, including, without limitation:
(a) The manner of protecting against diversion and theft without
imposing an undue burden on cannabis establishments or
compromising the confidentiality of consumers and holders of
registry identification cards and letters of approval, as those terms
are defined in NRS 678C.080 and 678C.070, respectively;
(b) Minimum requirements for the oversight of cannabis
establishments;
(c) Minimum requirements for the keeping of records by
cannabis establishments;
-
*AB308*

– 14 –
(d) Provisions for the security of cannabis establishments,
including, without limitation, requirements for the protection by a
fully operational security alarm system of each cannabis
establishment; and
(e) Procedures pursuant to which cannabis establishments must
use the services of cannabis independent testing laboratories to
ensure that any cannabis or cannabis product or commodity or
product made from hemp, as defined in NRS 557.160, sold by a
cannabis sales facility to an end user is tested for content, quality
and potency in accordance with standards established by the Board;
4. Establish circumstances and procedures pursuant to which
the maximum fees set forth in NRS 678B.390 may be reduced over
time to ensure that the fees imposed pursuant to NRS 678B.390 are,
insofar as may be practicable, revenue neutral;
5. Establish [different categories of cannabis establishment
agent registration cards, including, without limitation,] criteria for
issuance of a [cannabis establishment agent registration card for a
cannabis executive and a cannabis establishment agent] registration
card [for a cannabis receiver] and criteria for training and
certification, for each of the different types of cannabis
establishments at which such an agent may be employed or
volunteer or provide labor as a cannabis establishment agent;
6. As far as possible while maintaining accountability, protect
the identity and personal identifying information of each person who
receives, facilitates or delivers services in accordance with this
chapter;
7. Establish procedures and requirements to enable a dual
licensee to operate a medical cannabis establishment and an adult-
use cannabis establishment at the same location;
8. Determine whether any provision of this chapter or chapter
678C or 678D of NRS would make the operation of a cannabis
establishment by a dual licensee unreasonably impracticable;
9. Allow for any record relating to the delivery of cannabis or
cannabis products that is required to be kept by a cannabis
establishment to be created and maintained in an electronic format;
10. Prescribe the manner in which the Board will determine
whether a person who holds an adult-use cannabis establishment
license is ineligible to hold additional licenses pursuant to NRS
678B.325 and 678B.328;
11. Set forth rules pertaining to the safe and healthful operation
of cannabis consumption lounges, including, without limitation:
(a) Standards for the air quality in a cannabis consumption
lounge;
-
*AB308*

– 15 –
(b) Procedures and requirements for the collection and disposal
of cannabis and cannabis products which are left at a cannabis
consumption lounge; and
(c) Requirements for the training of employees of a cannabis
consumption lounge in the sale and safe consumption of single-use
cannabis products and ready-to-consume cannabis products; and
12. Address such other matters as the Board deems necessary
to carry out the provisions of this title.
Sec. 7. The amendatory provisions of this act apply to a
registration card, as defined in NRS 678A.235, issued or renewed on
or after October 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB308*